src/fst/morphology/affixes/abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ===========================================
!! # Continuation lexicons for abbreviations
! ===========================================

!! ## Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! ## The sublexica

!! ### Continuation lexicons for abbrs both with and witout final period

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj-trab   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+N:  ab-dot-noun-trab ;
+A:  ab-dot-adj-trab  ;

LEXICON ab-noun-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-noun ;
LEXICON ab-noun-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-noun ;
LEXICON ab-noun-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-noun ;
LEXICON ab-noun   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
         ab-nodot-noun ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-noun   ;

LEXICON ab-adj-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-adj ;
LEXICON ab-adj-trab  +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-adj ;
LEXICON ab-adj   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
         ab-nodot-adj ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-adj   ;

LEXICON ab-adv-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-adv ;
LEXICON ab-adv-numnoab +ABBR+Gram/NoAbbr:   ab-adv ; ! Used previously only by dii, dmu, tii
LEXICON ab-adv-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-adv ;
LEXICON ab-adv-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-adv ;
LEXICON ab-adv   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
         ab-nodot-adv ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-adv   ;

LEXICON ab-num-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-num ;
LEXICON ab-num   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
         ab-nodot-num ;
+Use/NG: ab-dot-num   ;

!! ### Lexicons without final period

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-noun   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  The bulk
 nodot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;
 nodot-oblique-infl       ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-nodot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-adj   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 nodot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-nodot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-adv-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-nodot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-nodot-adv   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           #     ;
    +Attr: #     ;
           RHyph ;
! +Sg+Nom: #     ;
! +Sg+Acc: #     ;
! +Sg+Gen: #     ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-num   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 nodot-nomaccgen-infl ;

!! ### Lexicons with final period

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-noab    +ABBR+Gram/NoAbbr:   ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON ab-dot-noun   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 dot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;
 nodot-oblique-infl ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adj-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-dot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adj-noab    +ABBR+Gram/NoAbbr:   ab-dot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adj-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-dot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adj-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-adj ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adj   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 dot-attrnomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON ab-dot-adv-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:     ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv-numnoab +ABBR+Gram/NumNoAbbr: ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:     ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr:  ab-dot-adv ;
LEXICON ab-dot-adv   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 DOT ; ! Adv without case.

LEXICON ab-dot-num-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-dot-num ;
LEXICON ab-dot-num-trab  +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-dot-num ;
LEXICON ab-dot-num   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
 dot-nomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON ab-dot-cc-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-dot-cc ;
LEXICON ab-dot-cc-trab  +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-dot-cc ;
LEXICON ab-dot-cc   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 DOT ;


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

LEXICON ab-verb-itrab +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr: ab-verb ;
LEXICON ab-verb-trab  +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr: ab-verb ;
LEXICON ab-verb   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
+Use/NG: ab-dot-verb   ;
         ab-nodot-verb ;


LEXICON ab-dot-verb-itrab   +ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:    ab-dot-verb ;
LEXICON ab-dot-verb-trab    +ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-dot-verb ;
LEXICON ab-dot-verb-trnumab +ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-verb ;
LEXICON ab-dot-verb   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +TV+Imprt: DOT ; ! Period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-verb   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +TV+Imprt: # ; ! No period.

! riegádan:

LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc-trab    +IV+ABBR+Gram/TAbbr:    ab-dot-IVprfprc ;
LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc-trnumab +IV+ABBR+Gram/TNumAbbr: ab-dot-IVprfprc ;
LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +PrfPrc: DOT ; ! Period.


LEXICON nodot-attrnomaccgen-infl   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 nodot-attr-infl      ;
 nodot-nomaccgen-infl ;

LEXICON nodot-attr-infl   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   +Attr: #     ;

LEXICON nodot-nomaccgen-infl   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom: #     ;
 +Sg+Acc: #     ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>%:a #     ; !km:a
 +Sg+Gen: #     ;
          RHyph ;

LEXICON nodot-oblique-infl
          +Sg+Ill:%>%:i     # ;
          +Sg+Loc:%>%:s     # ;
          +Sg+Com:%>%:in    # ;
          +Sg+Ess:%>%:n     # ;
          +Pl+Nom:%>%:t     # ;
          +Pl+Gen:%>%:id    # ;
          +Pl+Acc:%>%:id    # ;
          +Pl+Ill:%>%:ide   # ;
          +Pl+Loc:%>%:in    # ;
          +Pl+Com:%>%:igujn # ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>%:ii    # ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>%:as    # ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>%:ain   # ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>%:iin   # ;
 +Sg+Ess+Err/Orth:%>%:an    # ;

LEXICON dot-attrnomaccgen-infl   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   dot-nomaccgen-infl ;
   dot-attr           ;

LEXICON dot-attr   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   +Attr: DOT ;

LEXICON dot-nomaccgen-infl   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Sg+Nom: DOT ;
 +Sg+Acc: DOT ;
 +Sg+Gen: DOT ;


LEXICON DOT   !!≈ * **@CODE@** - Adds the dot to dotted abbreviations.
!! we also allow different variations of dotted abbreviations at
!! the end of the sentence (especially for tokenisers)
!! * "su." gets analysed as `"su" Adv ABBR`
!! in tokeniser mode also:
!! * "su." -> `"su" Adv ABBR` + `"." CLB` to account for sentence
!!    final su with no extra full stop.
!! * also `"son" Pron Pers Sg3 Gen/Acc` + `"." CLB` due to
!!   homonymy.
!! Same treatment is done with two and three full stops after abbreviation in
!! the end of the sentence:
!! * "su.." -> `"su" Adv Abbr` + `"." CLB Err/Orth`
!! * "su..." -> `"su" Adv Abbr` + `"..." CLB`
 +Use/-PMatch:. # ; ! We need the dot here for regular fsts
 +Err/Orth+Use/-PMatch:.. # ; ! We need the dot here for regular fsts
! Split the abbr + full stop in two segments, but only when using pmatch:
< "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {.} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 > # ;
! Make a regular ABBR analysis AND backtrack to find alternative analyses:
< "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:%. > # ;
! Error variants for cases with two full stops:
< "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {.} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 "+Err/Orth":"." > # ;
< "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:%. "+Err/Orth":"." > # ;
! folded three full-stops?
< "@P.Pmatch.Loc@" {...} "+CLB":0 "+Use/PMatch":0 > # ;
< "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:"." 0:%. 0:%. > # ;

! Gives:
!$ echo 'su.' \
!| hfst-tokenise -g tools/tokenisers/tokeniser-gramcheck-gt-desc.pmhfst
!"<su.>"
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"su" Adv ABBR Gram/NumNoAbbr <W:0.0> "<su>"
!	"su" Adv ABBR Gram/NumNoAbbr <W:0.0>
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"son" Pron Pers Sg3 Gen <W:0.0> "<su>"
!	"." CLB <W:0.0> "<.>"
!		"son" Pron Pers Sg3 Acc <W:0.0> "<su>"
!:\n
!
! which is exactly what we want.
